California statutes. Penal Code
 the defendant and within 60 days of the notice, determine how the term of imprisonment upon the second or other subsequent judgment shall run with reference to the prior incompleted term or terms of imprisonment. Upon the failure of the court to determine how the terms of imprisonment on the second or subsequent judgment shall run, the term of imprisonment on the second or subsequent judgment shall run concurrently.

 (c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall advise the court pronouncing the second or other subsequent judgment of the existence of all prior judgments against the defendant, the terms of imprisonment of which have not been completely served.

(d) When a court imposes a concurrent term of imprisonment and imprisonment for one of the crimes is required to be served in the state prison, the term for all crimes shall be served in the state prison, even if
 the term for any other offense specifies imprisonment in a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 23.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

670.

(a) Any person who violates Section 7158 or 7159 of, or subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 7161 of, the Business and Professions Code or Section 470, 484, 487, or 532 of this code as part of a plan or scheme to defraud an owner or lessee of a residential or nonresidential structure in connection with the offer or performance of repairs or improvements to the structure or property, or the adding to, or subtracting from, grounds in connection therewith, for damage or destruction caused by a natural disaster specified in subdivision (b), shall be subject to the penalties and enhancements specified in subdivisions (c) and (d). The existence of any fact which would bring a person under this section shall be alleged in the information or
 indictment and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(b) This section applies to natural disasters for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States.

(c) The maximum or prescribed amounts of fines for offenses subject to this section shall be doubled. If the person has been previously convicted of a felony offense specified in subdivision (a), the person shall receive a one-year enhancement in addition to, and to run consecutively
 to, the term of imprisonment for any felony otherwise prescribed by this subdivision.

(d) Additionally, the court shall order any person sentenced pursuant to this section to make full restitution to the victim or to make restitution to the victim based on the person’s ability to pay, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1203.1b. The payment of the restitution ordered by the court pursuant to this subdivision shall be made a condition of any probation granted by the court for an offense punishable under this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the period of probation shall be at least five years or until full restitution is made to the victim, whichever first occurs.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the prosecuting agency shall be entitled to
 recover its costs of investigation and prosecution from any fines imposed for a conviction under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 364, Sec. 6.   (SB 1189)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

Upon a conviction for any crime punishable by imprisonment in any jail or prison, in relation to which no fine is herein prescribed, the court may impose a fine on the offender not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in cases of misdemeanors or ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in cases of felonies, in addition to the imprisonment prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 320.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

It shall be unlawful to use in the reformatories, institutions, jails, state hospitals or any other state, county, or city institution any cruel, corporal or unusual punishment or to inflict any treatment or allow any lack of care whatever which would injure or impair the health of the prisoner, inmate, or person confined; and punishment by the use of the strait jacket, gag, thumbscrew, shower bath or the tricing up of a prisoner, inmate or person confined is hereby prohibited. Any person who violates the provisions of this section or who aids, abets, or attempts in any way to contribute to the violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 681 (as added by Stats. 1913, Ch. 583) by Stats. 1953, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

674.

(a) Any person who is a primary care provider in a day care facility and who is convicted of a felony violation of Section 261, 285, 286, 287, 288, or 289 or former Section 288a, where the victim of the crime was a minor entrusted to his or her care by the minor’s parent or guardian, a court, any public agency charged with the provision of social services, or a probation department, may be punished by an additional term of two years.

(b) If the crime described in subdivision (a) was
 committed while voluntarily acting in concert with another, the person so
 convicted may be punished by an additional term of three years.

(c) The enhancements authorized by this section may be imposed in addition to any other required or authorized enhancement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 72.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

(a) Any person suffering a felony conviction for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 261.5, paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 286, paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 287 or former Section 288a, or subdivision (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 288, where the offense was committed with a minor for money or other consideration, is punishable by an additional term of imprisonment in the state prison of one
 year.

(b) The enhancements authorized by this section may be imposed in addition to any other required or authorized enhancement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 73.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

Whenever in this code the character or grade of an offense, or its punishment, is made to depend upon the value of property, such value shall be estimated exclusively in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 616.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 17. RIGHTS OF VICTIMS AND WITNESSES OF CRIME [679. - 680.4.]

679.

In recognition of the civil and moral duty of victims and witnesses of crime to fully and voluntarily cooperate with law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies, and in further recognition of the continuing importance of this citizen cooperation to state and local law enforcement efforts and the general effectiveness and well-being of the criminal justice system of this state, the Legislature declares its intent, in the enactment of this title, to ensure that all victims and witnesses of crime are treated with dignity, respect, courtesy, and sensitivity. It is the further intent that the rights enumerated in Section 679.02 relating to victims and witnesses of crime are honored and protected by law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges in a manner no less vigorous than the protections afforded criminal defendants. It is the intent of the Legislature to add to Section 679.02 references to new rights as or as soon after they are created. The failure to enumerate in that section a right which is enumerated elsewhere in the law shall not be deemed to diminish the importance or enforceability of that right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1427, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

679.01.

As used in this title, the following definitions shall control:

(a) “Crime” means an act committed in this state which, if committed by a competent adult, would constitute a misdemeanor or felony.

(b) “Victim” means a person against whom a crime has been committed.

(c) “Witness” means any person who has been or is expected to testify for the prosecution, or who, by reason of having relevant information, is subject to call or likely to be called as a witness for the prosecution, whether or not any action or proceeding has yet been commenced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1427, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

679.015.

(a) It is the public policy of this state to protect the public from crime and violence by encouraging all persons who are victims of or witnesses to crimes, or who otherwise can give evidence in a criminal investigation, to cooperate with the criminal justice system and not to penalize these persons for being victims or for cooperating with the criminal justice system.

(b) Whenever an individual who is a victim of or witness to a crime, or who otherwise can give evidence in a criminal investigation, is not charged with or convicted of committing any crime under state law, a peace officer may not detain the individual exclusively for any actual or suspected immigration
 violation or turn the individual over to federal immigration authorities absent a judicial warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   (AB 493)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

679.02.

(a) The following rights are hereby established as the statutory rights of victims and witnesses of crimes:

(1) To be notified as soon as feasible that a court proceeding to which the victim or witness has been subpoenaed as a witness will not proceed as scheduled, provided the prosecuting attorney determines that the witness’ attendance is not required.

(2) Upon request of the victim or a witness, to be informed by the prosecuting attorney of the final disposition of the case, as provided by Section 11116.10.

(3) For the victim, the victim’s parents or guardian if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin of the victim if the victim
 has died, to be notified of all sentencing proceedings, and of the right to appear, to reasonably express their views, have those views preserved by audio or video means as provided in Section 1191.16, and to have the court consider their statements, as provided by Sections 1191.1 and 1191.15.

(4) For the victim, the victim’s parents or guardian if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, to be notified of all juvenile disposition hearings in which the alleged act would have been a felony if committed by an adult, and of the right to attend and to express their views, as provided by Section 656.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(5) Upon request by the victim or the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, to be notified of any parole eligibility hearing and of the right to appear, either personally as provided by Section 3043,
 or by other means as provided by Sections 3043.2 and 3043.25, to reasonably express their views, and to have their statements considered, as provided by Section 3043 of this code and by Section 1767 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) Upon request by the victim or the next of kin of the victim if the crime was a homicide, to be notified of an inmate’s placement in a reentry or work furlough program, or notified of the inmate’s escape as provided by Section 11155.

(7) To be notified that a witness may be entitled to witness fees and mileage, as provided by Section 1329.1.

(8) For the victim, to be provided with information concerning the victim’s right to civil recovery and the opportunity to be compensated from the Restitution Fund pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code and Section 1191.2 of this code.

(9) To the expeditious return of property that has allegedly been stolen or embezzled, when it is no longer needed as evidence, as provided by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1407) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1417) of Title 10 of Part 2.

(10) To an expeditious disposition of the criminal action.

(11) To be notified, if applicable, in accordance with Sections 679.03 and 3058.8 if the defendant is to be placed on parole.

(12) For the victim, upon request, to be notified of any pretrial disposition of the case, to the extent required by Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(A) A victim may
 request to be notified of a pretrial disposition.

(B) The victim may be notified by any reasonable means available.

(C) This paragraph is not intended to affect the right of the people and the defendant to an expeditious disposition as provided in Section 1050.

(13) For the victim, to be notified by the district attorney’s office of the right to request, upon a form provided by the district attorney’s office, and receive a notice pursuant to paragraph (14), if the
 defendant is convicted of any of the following offenses:

(A) Assault with intent to commit rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289, in violation of Section 220.

(B) A violation of Section 207 or 209 committed with the intent to commit a violation of Section 261, 286, 287, 288, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a.

(C) Rape, in violation of Section 261.

(D) Oral copulation, in violation of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(E) Sodomy, in violation of Section 286.

(F) A violation of Section 288.

(G) A violation of Section
 289.

(14) When a victim has requested notification pursuant to paragraph (13), the sheriff shall inform the victim that the person who was convicted of the offense has been ordered to be placed on probation, and give the victim notice of the proposed date upon which the person will be released from the custody of the sheriff.

(15) For the victim, to be notified of the availability of community-based restorative justice programs and processes available to them, including, but not limited to, programs serving their community, county, county jails, juvenile detention facilities, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The victim has a right to be notified as early and often as possible, including during the initial contact, during followup investigation, at the point of diversion,
 throughout the process of the case, and in postconviction proceedings.

(b) The rights set forth in subdivision (a) shall be set forth in the information and educational materials prepared pursuant to Section 13897.1. The information and educational materials shall be distributed to local law enforcement agencies and local victims’ programs by the Victims’ Legal Resource Center established pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 13897) of Title 6 of Part 4.

(c) Local law enforcement agencies shall make available copies of the materials described in subdivision (b) to victims and witnesses.

(d) This section is not intended to affect the rights and services provided to victims and witnesses by the local assistance centers for victims and witnesses.

(e) The court shall not release statements made pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) to the public prior to the statement being heard in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 513, Sec. 2.   (AB 60)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

679.026.

(a) It is the intent of the people of the State of California in enacting this section to implement the rights of victims of crime established in Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution to be informed of the rights of crime victims enumerated in the Constitution and in the statutes of this state.

(b) Every victim of crime has the right to receive without cost or charge a list of the rights of victims of crime recognized in Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution. These rights shall be known as “Marsy Rights.”

(c) (1) Every law enforcement agency investigating a criminal act and every agency prosecuting a criminal act shall, as provided herein, at the time of initial contact with a crime victim, during follow-up investigation, or as soon thereafter as deemed appropriate by investigating officers or prosecuting attorneys, provide or make available to each victim of the criminal act without charge or cost a “Marsy Rights” card described in paragraphs (3) and (4).

(2) The victim disclosures required under this section shall be available to the public at a state funded and maintained Web site authorized pursuant to Section 14260 of the Penal Code to be known as “Marsy’s Page.”

(3) The Attorney General shall design and make available in “.pdf” or other imaging format to every agency listed in paragraph (1) a “Marsy Rights” card, which shall contain the rights of crime victims described in subdivision (b) of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution, information on the means by which a crime victim can access the web page described in paragraph (2), and a toll-free telephone number to enable a crime victim to contact a local victim’s assistance office.

(4) Every law enforcement agency which investigates criminal activity shall, if provided without cost to the agency by any organization classified as a nonprofit organization under paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, make available and provide to every crime victim a “Victims’ Survival and Resource Guide” pamphlet and/or video that has been approved by the Attorney General. The “Victims’ Survival and Resource Guide” and video shall include an approved “Marsy Rights” card, a list of government agencies, nonprofit victims’ rights groups, support groups, and local resources that assist crime victims, and any other information which the Attorney General determines might be helpful to victims of crime.

(5) Any agency described in paragraph (1) may in its discretion design and distribute to each victim of a criminal act its own Victims’ Survival and Resource Guide and video, the contents of which have been approved by the Attorney General, in addition to or in lieu of the materials described in paragraph (4).

(History: Added November 4, 2008, by initiative Proposition 9, Sec. 6.1.   Note: Prop. 9 is titled the Victims' Bill of Rights Act of 2008: Marsy's Law.)
-------------------------------------------

679.027.

(a) Every law enforcement agency investigating a criminal act and every agency prosecuting a criminal act shall, as provided herein, at the time of initial contact with a crime victim, during followup investigation, or as soon thereafter as deemed appropriate by investigating officers or prosecuting attorneys, inform each victim, or the victim’s next of kin if the victim is deceased, of the rights they may have under applicable law relating to the victimization, including rights relating to housing, employment, compensation, and immigration relief.

(b) (1) Every law enforcement agency investigating a criminal act and every agency prosecuting a criminal act shall, as provided herein, at the time of initial contact with a crime victim, during
 followup investigation, or as soon thereafter as deemed appropriate by investigating officers or prosecuting attorneys, provide or make available to each victim of the criminal act without charge or cost a “Victim Protections and Resources” card described in paragraph (3).

(2) The Victim Protections and Resources card may be designed as part of and included with the “Marsy Rights” card described by Section 679.026.

(3) By June 1, 2025, the Attorney General shall design and make available in PDF or other imaging format to every agency listed in paragraph (1) a “Victim Protections and Resources” card, which shall contain information in lay terms about victim rights and resources, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Information about the rights provided by Section 12945.8 of the Government Code.

(B) Information about the rights provided by Section 1946.7 of the Civil Code.

(C) Information about the rights provided by Section 1161.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, including information in lay terms about which crimes and tenants are eligible and under what circumstances.

(D) Information about federal immigration relief available to certain victims of crime.

(E) Information about the program established by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13950) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including information about the types of expenses the program may reimburse, eligibility, and how to apply.

(F) Information about the program established by Chapter 3.1 (commencing
 with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(G) Information about eligibility for filing a restraining or protective order.

(H) Contact information for the Victims’ Legal Resource Center established by Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 13897) of Title 6 of Part 4.

(I) A list of trauma recovery centers funded by the state pursuant to Section 13963.1 of the Government Code, with their contact information, which shall be updated annually.

(J) The availability of community-based restorative justice programs and processes available to them, including programs serving their community, county, county jails, juvenile detention facilities, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 967, Sec. 7.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative July 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

679.03.

(a) With respect to the conviction of a defendant involving a violent offense, as defined in Section 29905, the county district attorney, probation department, and victim-witness coordinator shall confer and establish an annual policy within existing resources to decide which one of their agencies shall inform each witness involved in the conviction who was threatened by the defendant following the defendant’s arrest and each victim or next of kin of the victim of that offense of the right to request and receive a notice pursuant to Section 3058.8 or 3605. If no agreement is reached, the presiding judge shall designate the appropriate county agency or department to provide this notification.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall supply a form to the agency designated pursuant to subdivision (a) in order to enable persons specified in subdivision (a) to request and receive notification from the department of the release, escape, scheduled execution, or death of the violent offender. That agency shall give the form to the victim, witness, or next of kin of the victim for completion, explain to that person or persons the right to be so notified, and forward the completed form to the department. The department or the Board of Parole Hearings is responsible for notifying all victims, witnesses, or next of kin of victims who request to be notified of a violent offender’s release or scheduled execution, as provided by Sections 3058.8 and 3605.

(c) All information relating to any person receiving notice pursuant
 to subdivision (b) shall remain confidential and is not subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) Nothing in this section precludes a victim, witness, or next of kin of the victim from requesting notification using an automated electronic notification process, if available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 337.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

679.04.

(a) A victim of sexual assault as the result of any offense specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 264.2 has the right to have victim advocates and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at any interview by law enforcement authorities, district attorneys, or defense attorneys. A victim retains this right regardless of whether he or she has waived the right in a previous medical evidentiary or physical examination or in a previous interview by law enforcement authorities, district attorneys, or defense attorneys. However, the support person may be excluded from an interview by law enforcement or the district attorney if the law enforcement authority or the district attorney determines that the presence of that individual would be detrimental to the purpose of
 the interview. As used in this section, “victim advocate” means a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, or a victim advocate working in a center established under Article 2 (commencing with Section 13835) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4.

(b) (1) Prior to the commencement of the initial interview by law enforcement authorities or the district attorney pertaining to any criminal action arising out of a sexual assault, a victim of sexual assault as the result of any offense specified in Section 264.2 shall be notified in writing by the attending law enforcement authority or district attorney that he or she has the right to have victim advocates and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at the interview or contact, about any other rights of the victim pursuant to law in the card described in subdivision (a) of Section 680.2, and that the victim has the right to request to
 have a person of the same gender or opposite gender as the victim present in the room during any interview with a law enforcement official or district attorney, unless no such person is reasonably available. This subdivision applies to investigators and agents employed or retained by law enforcement or the district attorney.

(2) At the time the victim is advised of his or her rights pursuant to paragraph (1), the attending law enforcement authority or district attorney shall also advise the victim of the right to have victim advocates and a support person present at any interview by the defense attorney or investigators or agents employed by the defense attorney.

(3) The presence of a victim advocate shall not defeat any existing right otherwise guaranteed by law. A victim’s waiver of the right to a victim advocate is inadmissible in court, unless a court determines the waiver is
 at issue in the pending litigation.

(4) The victim has the right to request to have a person of the same gender or opposite gender as the victim present in the room during any interview with a law enforcement official or district attorney, unless no such person is reasonably available. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage every interviewer in this context to have trauma-based training.

(c) An initial investigation by law enforcement to determine whether a crime has been committed and the identity of the suspects shall not constitute a law enforcement interview for purposes of this section.

(d) A law enforcement official shall not, for any reason, discourage a victim of an alleged sexual assault from receiving a medical evidentiary or physical examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 692, Sec. 2.   (AB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

679.05.

(a) A victim of domestic violence or abuse, as defined in Sections 6203 or 6211 of the Family Code, or Section 13700 of the Penal Code, has the right to have a domestic violence advocate and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at any interview by law enforcement authorities, prosecutors, or defense attorneys. However, the support person may be excluded from an interview by law enforcement or the prosecutor if the law enforcement authority or the prosecutor determines that the presence of that individual would be detrimental to the purpose of the interview. As used in this section, “domestic violence advocate” means either a person employed by a program specified in Section 13835.2 for the purpose of rendering advice or assistance to victims of domestic violence, or a domestic violence counselor, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code. Prior to being present at any interview conducted by law enforcement authorities, prosecutors, or defense attorneys, a domestic violence advocate shall advise the victim of any applicable limitations on the confidentiality of communications between the victim and the domestic violence advocate.

(b) (1) Prior to the commencement of the initial interview by law enforcement authorities or the prosecutor pertaining to any criminal action arising out of a domestic violence incident, a victim of domestic violence or abuse, as defined in Section 6203 or 6211 of the Family Code, or Section 13700 of this code, shall be notified orally or in writing by the attending law enforcement authority or prosecutor that the victim has the right to have a domestic violence advocate and a support person of the victim’s choosing present at the interview or contact. This subdivision applies to investigators and agents employed or retained by law enforcement or the prosecutor.

(2) At the time the victim is advised of his or her rights pursuant to paragraph (1), the attending law enforcement authority or prosecutor shall also advise the victim of the right to have a domestic violence advocate and a support person present at any interview by the defense attorney or investigators or agents employed by the defense attorney.

(c) An initial investigation by law enforcement to determine whether a crime has been committed and the identity of the suspects shall not constitute a law enforcement interview for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 206, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

679.06.

(a) The county probation department shall notify a victim of domestic violence or abuse, as defined in Section 13700 or in Section 6203 or 6211 of the Family Code, or a victim of stalking, as defined in Section 646.9, of the perpetrator’s current community of residence or proposed community of residence upon release, when the perpetrator, after conviction, is placed on or being
 released on probation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1203 and under the supervision of the county probation department.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall only apply if the victim has requested notification and has provided the probation department with a current address at which they may be notified.

(c) The district attorney shall advise every victim described in subdivision (a) of their right to request and receive notification pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 941, Sec. 1.   (AB 547)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

679.07.

(a) Prior to making any findings as to the manner and cause of death of a deceased individual with an identifiable history of being victimized by domestic violence, and in the presence of three or more factors listed in subdivision (b), law enforcement investigators shall interview family members, such as parents, siblings, or other close friends or relatives of the decedent with relevant information regarding that history of domestic violence.

(b) Law enforcement investigators may request a complete autopsy, pursuant to Section 27521 of the Government Code, in a case where they have determined there is an identifiable history of being victimized by domestic violence
 and any of the following conditions are present:

(1) The decedent died prematurely or in an untimely manner.

(2) The scene of the death gives the appearance of death due to suicide or accident.

(3) One partner wanted to end the relationship.

(4) There is a history of being victimized by domestic violence that includes coercive control.

(5) The decedent is found dead in a home or place of residence.

(6) The decedent is found by a current or previous partner.

(7) There is a history of
 being victimized by domestic violence that includes strangulation or suffocation.

(8) The current or previous partner of the decedent, or child of the decedent or the decedent’s current or previous partner, is the last to see the decedent alive.

(9) The partner had control of the scene before law enforcement arrived.

(10) The body of the decedent has been moved or the scene or other evidence is altered in some way.

(c) Sworn law enforcement personnel investigating a death where it has been determined that the decedent has an identifiable history of being victimized by domestic violence shall be current in their training related to domestic violence incidents,
 including training required pursuant to Section 13519. 

(d) During the pendency of the investigation and any review,
 family members shall have access to all victim services and support provided under this title.

(e) In the event that a local law enforcement agency makes a finding that the death is not a homicide and closes the case, family members or their legal counsel shall have the right to request any and all records of the investigation currently available under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(f) This section does not require local law enforcement agencies to compromise an existing or open investigation and does not preempt the discretion provided to local law enforcement agencies in the investigation of death cases. This section does not impose any additional liability on a local law
 enforcement agency for its investigation of existing cases or its investigative conclusions in those cases.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Domestic violence” has the same meaning as used in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(2) “Identifiable history of being victimized by domestic violence” means demonstrable past incidents of being victimized by domestic violence that may be verified by prior police reports, written or photographic documentation, restraining order declarations, eyewitness statements, or other evidence that corroborates a history of such incidents.

(3) “Partner” means a spouse, former
 spouse, cohabitant, former cohabitant, fiance, someone with whom the decedent had a dating relationship or engagement for marriage, or the parent of the decedent’s child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 654, Sec. 4.   (SB 989)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

679.08.

(a) (1) Whenever there has been a crime committed against a victim, the law enforcement officer assigned to the case may provide the victim of the crime with a “Victim’s Rights Card,” as specified in subdivision (b).

(2) This section shall be operative in a city or county only upon the adoption of a resolution by the city council or board of supervisors to that effect.

(3) This section shall not be interpreted as replacing or prohibiting any services currently offered to victims of crime by any agency or person affected by this section.

(b) A “Victim’s Rights Card” means a card or paper that provides a printed notice with a disclaimer, in at least 10-point type, to a victim of a crime regarding potential services that may be available under existing state law to assist the victim. The printed notice shall include the following language or language substantially similar to the following:

“California law provides crime victims with important rights. If you are a victim of crime, you may be entitled to the assistance of a victim advocate who can answer many of the questions you might have about the criminal justice system.”

“Victim advocates can assist you with the following:

(1) Explaining what information you are entitled to receive while criminal proceedings are pending.

(2) Assisting you in applying for restitution to compensate you for crime-related losses.

(3) Communicating with the prosecution.

(4) Assisting you in receiving victim support services.

(5) Helping you prepare a victim impact statement before an offender is sentenced.”

“To speak with a victim advocate, please call any of the following numbers:”

 [Set forth the name and phone number, including area code, of all victim advocate agencies in the local jurisdiction]

“PLEASE NOTE THAT THIS INFORMATION IS PROVIDED IN AN ATTEMPT TO ASSIST THE VICTIM, BY NOTIFYING THE VICTIM ABOUT SOME, BUT NOT NECESSARILY ALL, SERVICES AVAILABLE TO THE VICTIM; THE PROVISION OF THIS INFORMATION AND THE INFORMATION CONTAINED THEREIN IS NOT LEGAL ADVICE AND IS NOT INTENDED TO CONSTITUTE A GUARANTEE OF ANY VICTIM’S RIGHTS OR OF A VICTIM’S ELIGIBILITY OR ENTITLEMENT TO ANY SPECIFIC BENEFITS OR SERVICES.”

(c) Any act or omission covered by this section is a discretionary act pursuant to Section 820.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

679.09.

(a) In the event of a death of a minor being investigated by law enforcement, the law enforcement agency that bears the primary responsibility for the investigation shall provide the victim’s parent or guardian, with the following information, if and when the parent or guardian are located:

(1) Contact information for each law enforcement agency involved in the investigation and the identification of the primary contact, if known, for the particular investigation at the involved law enforcement agency.

(2) The case number referencing the investigation, if applicable.

(3) A list of the personal effects found with the minor and contact information necessary to permit an immediate family member to collect the victim’s personal effects collected pursuant to Section 27491.3 of the Government Code. The list of the victim’s personal effects may be withheld from the immediate family if providing information about the personal effects would interfere with the investigation being conducted by law enforcement.

(4) Information regarding the status of the investigation, at the discretion of the law enforcement agency.

(b) In the event
 that a parent or guardian is not located, the law enforcement agency that bears the primary responsibility for the investigation shall provide the victim’s immediate family, at their request, with the following information:

(1) Contact information for each law enforcement agency involved in the investigation and the identification of the primary contact, if known, for the particular investigation at the involved law enforcement agency.

(2) The case number referencing the investigation, if applicable.

(3) A list of the personal effects found with the minor and contact information necessary to permit an immediate family member to collect the victim’s personal effects collected pursuant to Section 27491.3 of